Utah statutes.
11-14-313.   Issuance of negotiable notes or bonds authorized -- Limitation
on amount of tax anticipation notes or bonds -- Procedure.
(1) (a)  For the purpose of meeting the current expenses of the local
political subdivision and for any other purpose for which funds of the local
political subdivision may be expended, a local political subdivision may, if
authorized by a resolution of its governing body, borrow money by issuing its
negotiable notes or bonds in an initial principal amount:
(i)  not in excess of 90% of the taxes and other revenues of the local
political subdivision for the current fiscal year, if the notes or bonds are
issued after the annual tax levy for taxes falling due during the fiscal year
in which the notes or bonds are issued;
(ii)  not in excess of 75% of the taxes and other revenues of the local
political subdivision for the preceding fiscal year, if the notes or bonds are
issued prior to the annual tax levy for taxes falling due during the fiscal
year in which the bonds or notes are issued; or
(iii)  not in excess of 75% of the taxes and other revenues that the governing
body of the local political subdivision estimates that the local political
subdivision will receive for the current fiscal year, if the notes or bonds
are issued within 24 months following the creation of the local political
subdivision.
(b)  The proceeds of the notes or bonds shall be applied only in payment of
current and necessary expenses and other purposes for which funds of the local
political subdivision may be expended.
(c)  There shall be included in the annual levy a tax and there shall be
provision made for the imposition and collection of sufficient revenues other
than taxes sufficient to pay the notes or bonds at maturity.
(d)  If the taxes and other revenues in any one year are insufficient through
delinquency or uncollectibility of taxes or other cause to pay when due all
the lawful debts of the local political subdivision which have been or may
hereafter be contracted, the governing body of the local political subdivision
is authorized and directed to levy and collect in the next succeeding year a
sufficient tax and to provide for the imposition and collection of sufficient
revenues other than taxes to pay all of such lawfully contracted indebtedness,
and may borrow as provided in this section in anticipation of such tax and
other revenues to pay any such lawfully contracted indebtedness.
(e)  Each resolution authorizing the issuance of tax anticipation notes or
bonds shall:
(i)  describe the taxes or revenues in anticipation of which the notes or
bonds are to be issued; and
(ii)  specify the principal amount of the notes or bonds, any interest rates,
including a variable interest rate, the notes or bonds shall bear, and the
maturity dates of the notes or bonds, which dates may not extend beyond the
last day of the issuing local political subdivision's fiscal year.
(2)  Tax anticipation notes or bonds shall be issued and sold in such manner
and at such prices, whether at, below, or above face value, as the governing
body shall by resolution determine.  Tax anticipation notes or bonds shall be
in bearer form, except that the governing body may provide for the
registration of the notes or bonds in the name of the owner, either as to
principal alone, or as to principal and interest.  Tax anticipation notes or
bonds may be made redeemable prior to maturity at the option of the governing
body in the manner and upon the terms fixed by the resolution authorizing
their issuance.  Tax anticipation notes or bonds shall be executed and shall
be in such form and have such details and terms as shall be provided in the
authorizing resolution.
(3)  The provisions of Sections 11-14-303, 11-14-304, 11-14-305, 11-14-313,
11-14-315, 11-14-316, 11-14-401, 11-14-403, and 11-14-404 shall apply to all
tax anticipation notes or bonds issued under this section.  In applying these
sections to tax anticipation notes, "bond" or "bonds" as used in these
sections shall be deemed to include tax anticipation notes.
